Utah statutes.
17-16a-7.   Interest in business entity doing business with county -- Disclosure.

Every appointed or elected officer who is an officer, director, agent, or employee, or owner of a substantial interest in any business entity which does or anticipates doing business with the county in which he is an appointed or elected officer, shall publicly disclose to the members of the body on which he is a member immediately prior to any discussion by such body matters relating to such business entity, the nature of his interest in that business entity. The disclosure statement shall be entered in the minutes of the meeting.

